Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 23.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8923
Limitations on veterinary drug distributor.

A veterinary drug distributor shall not:

(1) Operate from a place of residence;

(2) Possess, sell, purchase, trade, or otherwise furnish controlled substances; and

(3) Possess, sell, purchase, trade, or otherwise furnish human legend drugs.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 23.